sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Raketbal a squash: Raketbalové a squashové loptičky; Čistiace príslušenstvo na raketbal a squash; Raketbalové a squashové okuliare; Raketbalové a squashové rukavice; Príslušenstvo pre raketbalové a squashové rakety; Raketbalová a squashová obuv; Raketbalové a squashové tréningové pomôcky; Raketbalové rakety; Squashové rakety
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Ракетбол и сквош: Мячи для ракетбола и сквоша; Аксессуары для чистки (ракетбол и сквош); Очки для сквоша и ракетбола; Перчатки для ракетбола и сквоша; Аксессуары для ракеток для ракетбола и сквоша; Обувь для сквоша и ракетбола; Тренировочный инвентарь для ракетбола и сквоша; Ракетки для ракетбола; Ракетки для сквоша
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Raketbal a squash: Míče na raketbal a squash; Příslušenství pro čištění na racquetball a squash; Brýle na squash a raketbal; Rukavice na squash a raketbal; Příslušenství k raketám na racquetball a squash; Boty na raketbal a squash; Tréninkové pomůcky na squash a raketbal; Raketbalové rakety; Squashové rakety
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Racquetball og squash: Bolde til racquetball og squash; Rengøringstilbehør til racquetball og squash; Squash- og racquetballbriller; Handsker til squash og racquetball; Ketchertilbehør til racquetball og squash; sko til racketball og squash; Racquetball og squash – træningshjælpemidler; Racquetballketsjere; Squashketsjere
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Ракетбол и скуош: Топки за ракетбол и скуош; Аксесоари за почистване на ракетбол и скуош; Очила за ракетбол и скуош; Ръкавици за ракетбол и скуош; Аксесоари за ракети за ракебол и скуош; Обувки за ракетбол и скуош; Помощни средства за ракетбол и скуош; Ракети за ракетбол; Ракети за скуош
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Racketboll och squash: Bollar till racketboll och squash; Rengöringstillbehör för racquetball och squash; Skyddsglasögon för squash och racketboll; Handskar för squash och racquetball; Rackettillbehör för racquetball och squash; Racksports- och squashskor; Träningshjälpmedel för racketboll och squash; Racketbollracketar; Squashracketar
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Racquetball și squash: Mingi pentru racquetball și squash; Accesorii de curățare pentru rachete de racquetball și squash; Ochelari pentru racquetball și squash; Mănuși pentru racquetball și squash; Accesorii pentru rachete de racquetball și squash; Pantofi pentru racquetball și squash; Articole antrenament de racquetball și squash; Rachete pentru racquetball; Rachete pentru squash
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Racquetball i squash: Piłki do racquetballa i squasha; Akcesoria do czyszczenia sprzętu do racquetballa i squasha; Gogle do gry w squasha i raquetballa; Rękawice do gry w squasha i raquetballa; Akcesoria do rakiet do racquetballa i squasha; Buty do gry w racquetballa i squasha; Pomoce treningowe do racquetballa i squasha; Rakiety do racquetballa; Rakiety do squasha
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 라켓볼/스쿼시: 라켓볼/스쿼시 공; 라켓볼 및 스쿼시 청소용 액세서리; 라켓볼/스쿼시 안경; 라켓볼/스쿼시 장갑; 라켓볼 및 스쿼시 라켓 액세서리; 라켓볼/스쿼시화; 라켓볼/스쿼시 훈련 장비; 라켓볼 라켓; 스쿼시 라켓
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng quần: Quả bóng quần; Phụ kiện vệ sinh dụng cụ racquetball và squash; Kính mắt chơi Racquetball & Squash; Găng tay Racquetball và bóng quần; Phụ kiện vợt Racquetball & bóng quần; Giày chơi racquetball và bóng quần; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập Racquetball & Squash; Vợt racquetball; Vợt squash
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 短网拍墙球/壁球: 短网拍墙球/壁球用球; 墙网球和壁球清洁配件; 壁球护目镜; 短网拍墙球/壁球手套; 墙球与壁球拍配件; 短网拍墙球/壁球鞋; 墙球/壁球训练辅助用品; 墙球拍; 壁球拍
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Raketball és squash: Raketball és squash labdák; Fallabda- és squash-tisztító kiegészítők; Raketball és squash szemfedők; Raketball és squash kesztyűk; Racquetball- és squashütő-kiegészítők; Raketball és squash cipők; Raketball és squash edzési segédeszközök; Raketball ütők; Squash ütők
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Racquetball et squash: Balles de racquetball et de squash; Accessoires de nettoyage pour racquetball et squash; Lunettes de squash et de racquetball; Gants de squash et de racquetball; Accessoires pour raquettes de squash et racquetball; Chaussures de racquetball et de squash; Aides à l’entraînement au racquetball et au squash; Raquettes de racquetball; Raquettes de squash
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Racquetball og squash: Baller for racquetball og squash; Rengjøringstilbehør til racquetball og squash; Briller for racquetball og squash; Hansker for racquetball og squash; Rackettilbehør for racquetball og squash; Sko til racquetball og squash; Treningshjelpemidler for racquetball og squash; Racketer for racquetball; Squashracketer
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Racquetball & Squash: Racquetball & Squash Balls; Racquetball & Squash Cleaning Accessories; Racquetball & Squash Eyewear; Racquetball & Squash Gloves; Racquetball & Squash Racket Accessories; Racquetball & Squash Shoes; Racquetball & Squash Training Aids; Racquetball Rackets; Squash Rackets
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Racquetball en squash: Ballen voor racquetball en squash; Schoonmaakaccessoires voor racquetball en squash; Squash- en racquetballbrillen; Squash- en racquetballhandschoenen; Racquetball- en squashracketaccessoires; Schoenen voor racquetball en squash; Squash- en racquetballtrainingshulpmiddelen; Racquetballrackets; Squashrackets
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Squash e raquetebol: Bolas de squash e raquetebol; Acessórios de limpeza para raquetebol e squash; Óculos para squash e raquetebol; Luvas para squash e raquetebol; Acessórios para raquetes de raquetebol e squash; Sapatos de squash e raquetebol; Auxiliares de treino para raquetebol e squash; Raquetes de raquetebol; Raquetes de squash
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Ráquetbol y squash: Pelotas de ráquetbol y squash; Accesorios de limpieza para raquetbol y squash; Lentes para ráquetbol y squash; Guantes para squash y ráquetbol; Accesorios para raquetas de racquetball y squash; Calzado de ráquetbol y squash; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de ráquetbol y squash; Raquetas de ráquetbol; Raquetas de squash
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Reketbol i skvoš: Loptice za reketbol i skvoš; Dodaci za čišćenje za reketbol i skvoš; Naočale za reketbol i skvoš; Rukavice za reketbol i skvoš; Dodaci za rekete za reketbol i skvoš; Tenisice za reketbol i skvoš; Pomagala za trening za reketbol i skvoš; Reketi za reketbol; Reketi za skvoš
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Racquetball ve Squash: Racquetball ve Squash Topları; Raketbol ve squash temizlik aksesuarları; Squash ve Raquetball Gözlüğü; Squash ve Racquetball Eldivenleri; Raketbol ve squash raketi aksesuarları; Racquetball ve Squash Ayakkabıları; Racquetball ve Squash Eğitim Araçları; Racquetball Raketleri; Squash Raketleri
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Racquetball e squash: Palle da racquetball e da squash; Accessori per pulizia per racquetball e squash; Occhiali protettivi per squash/racquetball; Guanti da squash e racquetball; Accessori per racchette da racquetball e squash; Scarpe da racquetball e da squash; Ausili per l'allenamento di racquetball e squash; Racchette da racqueball; Racchette da squash
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > แร็กเกตบอลและสควอช: ลูกบอลของแร็กเกตบอลและสควอช; อุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาดไม้แร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; แว่นตาสำหรับแร็กเกตบอลและสควอช; ถุงมือของแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอซ; อุปกรณ์เสริมไม้แร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; รองเท้าแร็กเกตบอลและสควอช; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; ไม้ตีแร็กเก็ตบอล; ไม้สควอช
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Raketbolas ir skvošas: Raketbolo ir skvošo kamuoliukai; Raketbolo ir skvošo valymo priedai; Raketbolo ir skvošo akiniai; Raketbolo ir skvošo pirštinės; Raketbolo ir skvošo rakečių priedai; Raketbolo ir skvošo bateliai; Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Raketbolo raketės; Skvošo raketės
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Racquetball & Squash: Racquetball- & Squash-Bälle; Reinigungszubehör für Racquetball & Squash; Squash- & Racquetball-Schutzbrillen; Squash- & Racquetball-Handschuhe; Zubehör für Racquetball- & Squashschläger; Racquetball- & Squash-Schuhe; Racquetball- & Squash-Trainingshilfen; Racquetball-Schläger; Squashschläger
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > スカッシュ・ラケットボール: スカッシュ・ラケットボール用ボール; ラケットボール・スカッシュ用クリーニングアクセサリー; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用ゴーグル; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用グローブ; ラケットボール・スカッシュ用ラケットアクセサリー; ラケットボール・スカッシュシューズ; スカッシュ・ラケットボール練習器具; ラケットボール用ラケット; スカッシュラケット
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Racquetball in skvoš: Žogice za igranje racquetballa in skvoša; Racquetball in skvoš Dodatki za čiščenje; Očala za igranje racquetballa in skvoša; Rokavice za igranje racquetballa in skvoša; Racquetball in skvoš Dodatki za loparje; Obutev za racquetball in skvoš; Pripomočki za vadbo racquetballa in skvoša; Loparji za racquetball; Loparji za skvoš
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Racquetball ja squash: Racquetball- ja squash-pallot; Racquetballin ja squashin puhdistustarvikkeet; Racquetball- ja squash-lasit; Racquetball- ja squash-hanskat; Racquetball- ja squash-mailojen lisävarusteet; Racquetball- ja squash-kengät; Racquetball- ja squash-harjoitteluvälineet; Racquetball-mailat; Squash-mailat
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 短柄牆球/壁球: 短柄牆球/壁球用球; 美式壁球與壁球清潔配件; 短柄牆球/壁球護眼用具; 短柄牆球/壁球手套; 短柄牆球與壁球拍配件; 短柄牆球/壁球鞋; 短柄牆球和壁球訓練輔助工具; 短柄牆球拍; 壁球拍
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ρακέτα και σκουός: Μπάλες ρακέτας & σκουός; Αξεσουάρ καθαρισμού ρακετμπόλ & σκουός; Γυαλιά ρακέτας & σκουός; Γάντια ρακέτας & σκουός; Αξεσουάρ ρακετών ράκετμπολ και σκουός; Παπούτσια ρακέτας & σκουός; Βοηθήματα προπόνησης ρακέτας & σκουός; Ρακέτες (Racquetball Rackets); Ρακέτες σκουός
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Raquetebol e squash: Bolas para raquetebol e squash; Acessórios de limpeza para raquetebol e squash; Óculos de proteção para jogos de raquetebol e squash; Luvas de squash e raquetebol; Acessórios para raquetes de raquetebol e squash; Sapatos de raquetebol e squash; Auxiliares de treinamento de raquetebol e squash; Raquetes para raquetebol; Raquetes de squash